Wisconsin, session 2025, SB868.
do enact as follows:SB868,11Section 1. 36.28 of the statutes is created to read:SB868,2,3236.28 Financial aid reduction restrictions. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:SB868,2,44(a) “Cost of attendance” has the meaning given in 20 USC 1087ll.SB868,2,65(b) “Financial need” means a student’s cost of attendance minus the student’s 6student aid index.SB868,2,87(c) “Gift aid” means all financial aid that is not a loan or work-study program, 8including grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and 3rd-party payments.SB868,2,109(d) “Institutional gift aid” means gift aid that is funded by the system, the 10board, or an institution.SB868,3,211(e) “Private scholarship” means a scholarship of $5,000 or less awarded by a 12Wisconsin-based entity. “Private scholarship” does not include an award funded by 13an entity that is affiliated with the system, the board, or an institution and that 1requests that the system, the board, or an institution provide assistance in selecting 2recipients.SB868,3,43(f) “Student aid index” means the amount determined in accordance with 20 4USC 1087nn.SB868,3,55(g) “Wisconsin-based entity” means any of the following:SB868,3,661. An entity that has its primary place of business located in this state.SB868,3,972. A local or state branch of an entity that has its primary place of business 8located in the United States if the local or state branch of the entity has its primary 9place of business located in this state.SB868,3,1210(2) Financial aid reduction restrictions. (a) An institution may reduce a 11student’s institutional gift aid offer as a result of a private scholarship award only 12as described in one or more of the following manners:SB868,3,19131. Subject to par. (b), if a student’s total gift aid from all sources exceeds the 14student’s financial need, an institution may reduce the student’s institutional gift 15aid until the student’s total gift aid no longer exceeds the student’s financial need. 16Before an institution may reduce the student’s institutional gift aid offer under this 17subdivision, the institution shall alert the student that the student may request the 18institution to reassess the student’s cost of attendance figure, and the institution 19shall reassess the student’s cost of attendance figure if requested by the student.SB868,3,23202. In addition to the reduction authorized under subd. 1., an institution may 21further reduce a student’s institutional gift aid if the institution receives approval 22from the Wisconsin-based entity that awarded the private scholarship that 23triggered the reduction authorized under subd. 1.SB868,4,313. An institution may reduce a student athlete’s institutional gift aid in order 2to comply with a governing national intercollegiate athletic association’s individual 3or team financial aid restrictions.SB868,4,174(b) If the award of a private scholarship causes a student’s total aid from all 5sources to exceed the student’s financial need, an institution may reduce the 6student’s institutional gift aid until the student’s total aid no longer exceeds the 7student’s financial need if, before reducing the institutional gift aid, and if 8applicable and to the extent permitted by the federal department of education, the 9institution first attempts to correct for the excess by reducing the portion of the 10student’s total aid associated with a loan or a work-study program or replacing 11some or all of the student’s student aid index amount with an amount associated 12with a loan or work-study program. If, after this attempt, the student’s total aid 13still exceeds the student’s financial need, before the institution may reduce the 14student’s institutional gift aid, the institution shall alert the student that the 15student may request the institution to reassess the student’s cost of attendance 16figure, and the institution shall reassess the student’s cost of attendance figure if 17requested by the student.SB868,5,318(c) If a student has received a private scholarship that has been awarded to 19the student in a manner that constrains how the institution may apply the private 20scholarship amount to the student’s cost of attendance, the institution shall make a 21sincere attempt to contact the private scholarship award provider and ask for the 22private scholarship to be rescinded and re-awarded to the student in a way that 23does not constrain how the institution applies the private scholarship to the 1student’s cost of attendance or for the private scholarship award provider to clarify 2the way in which the private scholarship may be used. The private scholarship 3provider is not required to comply with the institution’s request.SB868,5,54(d) This subsection shall be implemented to the maximum extent that federal 5law permits.SB868,26Section 2. 38.25 of the statutes is created to read:SB868,5,8738.25 Financial aid reduction restrictions. (1) Definitions. In this 8section:SB868,5,99(a) “Cost of attendance” has the meaning given in 20 USC 1087ll.SB868,5,1110(b) “Financial need” means a student’s cost of attendance minus the student’s 11student aid index.SB868,5,1312(c) “Gift aid” means all financial aid that is not a loan or work-study program, 13including grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and 3rd-party payments.SB868,5,1514(d) “Institutional gift aid” means gift aid that is funded by the board, a district 15board, or a technical college.SB868,5,2016(e) “Private scholarship” means a scholarship of $5,000 or less awarded by a 17Wisconsin-based entity. “Private scholarship” does not include an award funded by 18an entity that is affiliated with the board, a district board, or a technical college and 19that requests that the board, a district board, or a technical college provide 20assistance in selecting recipients.SB868,5,2221(f) “Student aid index” means the amount determined in accordance with 20 22USC 1087nn.SB868,5,2323(g) “Wisconsin-based entity” means any of the following:SB868,6,111. An entity that has its primary place of business located in this state.SB868,6,422. A local or state branch of an entity that has its primary place of business 3located in the United States if the local or state branch of the entity has its primary 4place of business located in this state.SB868,6,75(2) Financial aid reduction restrictions. (a) A technical college may 6reduce a student’s institutional gift aid offer as a result of a private scholarship 7award only as described in one or more of the following manners:SB868,6,1581. Subject to par. (b), if a student’s total gift aid from all sources exceeds the 9student’s financial need, a technical college may reduce the student’s institutional 10gift aid until the student’s total gift aid no longer exceeds the student’s financial 11need. Before a technical college may reduce the student’s institutional gift aid offer 12under this subdivision, the technical college shall alert the student that the student 13may request the technical college to reassess the student’s cost of attendance figure, 14and the technical college shall reassess the student’s cost of attendance figure if 15requested by the student.SB868,6,19162. In addition to the reduction authorized under subd. 1., a technical college 17may further reduce a student’s institutional gift aid if the technical college receives 18approval from the Wisconsin-based entity that awarded the private scholarship 19that triggered the reduction authorized under subd. 1.SB868,6,22203. A technical college may reduce a student athlete’s institutional gift aid in 21order to comply with a governing national intercollegiate athletic association’s 22individual or team financial aid restrictions.SB868,7,1323(b) If the award of a private scholarship causes a student’s total aid from all 1sources to exceed the student’s financial need, a technical college may reduce the 2student’s institutional gift aid until the student’s total aid no longer exceeds the 3student’s financial need if, before reducing the institutional gift aid, and if 4applicable and to the extent permitted by the federal department of education, the 5technical college first attempts to correct for the excess by reducing the portion of 6the student’s total aid associated with a loan or a work-study program or replacing 7some or all of the student’s student aid index amount with an amount associated 8with a loan or work-study program. If, after this attempt, the student’s total aid 9still exceeds the student’s financial need, before the technical college may reduce 10the student’s institutional gift aid, the technical college shall alert the student that 11the student may request the technical college to reassess the student’s cost of 12attendance figure, and the technical college shall reassess the student’s cost of 13attendance figure if requested by the student.SB868,7,2314(c) If a student has received a private scholarship that has been awarded to 15the student in a manner that constrains how the technical college may apply the 16private scholarship amount to the student’s cost of attendance, the technical college 17shall make a sincere attempt to contact the private scholarship award provider and 18ask for the private scholarship to be rescinded and re-awarded to the student in a 19way that does not constrain how the technical college applies the private 20scholarship to the student’s cost of attendance or for the private scholarship award 21provider to clarify the way in which the private scholarship may be used. The 22private scholarship provider is not required to comply with the technical college’s 23request.SB868,8,21(d) This subsection shall be implemented to the maximum extent that federal 2law permits.SB868,33Section 3. 39.55 of the statutes is created to read:SB868,8,5439.55 Financial aid reduction restrictions. (1) Definitions. In this 5section:SB868,8,66(a) “Cost of attendance” has the meaning given in 20 USC 1087ll.SB868,8,117(b) “External scholarship” means a scholarship of $5,000 or less awarded by a 8Wisconsin-based entity. “External scholarship” does not include an award funded 9by an entity that is affiliated with a private higher education institution and that 10requests that the private higher education institution provide assistance in 11selecting recipients.SB868,8,1312(c) “Financial need” means a student’s cost of attendance minus the student’s 13student aid index.SB868,8,1514(d) “Gift aid” means all financial aid that is not a loan or work-study program, 15including grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and 3rd-party payments.SB868,8,1716(e) “Institutional gift aid” means gift aid that is funded by a private higher 17education institution. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb868 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb868 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB868 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB868 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB868: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting